Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-13] Termination. (a)
Collection of the nursing facility sustainability fee under section 346F-5
shall be discontinued if:

(1) The waiver in section 346F-7 or the enhanced
capitation rates in section 346F-10 have not been approved by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services;

(2) The department reduces funding for nursing
facility services below the state appropriation in effect on June 30, 2016;

(3) The department or any other state agency uses the
money in the special fund for any use other than the uses permitted pursuant to
this chapter; or

(4) Federal financial participation to match the
nursing facility sustainability fee becomes unavailable under federal law. In
such case, the department shall terminate the collection of the fee beginning
on the effective date of the federal statutory, regulatory, or interpretive
change.

(b) If collection of the nursing facility
sustainability fee is discontinued as provided in this section, any remaining
money in the special fund shall be returned to the nursing facilities from
which the fee was collected within thirty days in the same proportions as
received from the nursing facilities. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013,
c 142, §§2(4), 3; am L 2014, c 124, §§1(3), 2; am L 2015, c 69, §§1(4), 2; am L
2016, c 59, §1(3)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next